Hawaii statutes.
[§340E-23] Rules. The director, by
rules adopted under chapter 91, may establish state standards which shall
supersede interim action levels. As soon as practicable and within two years
of the establishment of an interim action level, and every two years thereafter
until a federal or state standard is established to supersede an interim action
level, the director of health shall review all available scientific information
to determine whether there is sufficient basis to establish a state standard to
supersede an interim action level. Prior to adopting rules to establish state
standards, the director shall conduct at least one public hearing to provide
information to the public on the nature of the chemical contaminant under
review and to afford the public an opportunity to present information and
concerns to the department relating to the chemical contaminant under review.
[L 1987, c 297, pt of §2(2)]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next